Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Controlled Substances
§ 35-7-1058.
Definitions.

As used in this section and W.S.

35-7-1059

:

“Booby trap” means any concealed or camouflaged device designed to cause bodily injury when triggered by any action of a person making contact with the device. “Booby trap” includes guns, ammunition or explosive devices attached to trip wires or other triggering mechanisms, sharpened stakes, nails, spikes, electrical devices, lines or wire with hooks attached and devices for the production of toxic fumes or gases;

“Clandestine laboratory operation” means:

Purchasing or procuring chemicals, supplies, equipment or a laboratory location for the illegal manufacture of controlled substances;

Transporting or arranging for the transportation of chemicals, supplies or equipment for the illegal manufacture of controlled substances;

Setting up equipment or supplies in preparation for the illegal manufacture of controlled substances; or

Distributing or disposing of chemicals, equipment, supplies or products used in or produced by the illegal manufacture of controlled substances.

“Disposal” means abandoning, discharging, depositing, injecting, dumping, spilling, leaking or placing any hazardous or dangerous material into or on any property, land or water so that the material may enter the environment, be emitted into the air or discharged into any waters, including groundwater;

“Equipment” or “laboratory equipment” means all products, components or materials of any kind when used, intended for use or designed for use in the manufacture, preparation, production, compounding, conversion or processing of a controlled substance in violation of this section or W.S.

35-7-1059

. “Equipment” or “laboratory equipment” includes:

Glass reaction vessel;

Separatory funnel;

Glass condensor;

Analytical balance; or

Heating mantle.

“Hazardous or dangerous material” means any substance which because of its quantity, concentration, physical characteristics or chemical characteristics may cause or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality, an increase in serious illness or may pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, disposed of or otherwise improperly managed;

“List I controlled substance precursor” means, including a chemical reagent, any salt, isomer or salt of an isomer of:

Anthranilic acid;

Barbituric acid;

Benzaldehyde;

Benzyl chloride;

Benzyl cyanide;

D-lysergic acid;

Diethyl malonate;

Ephedrine;

Ergonovine;

Ergotamine;

Ethyl malonate;

Ethylamine;

Hydriotic acid;

Insosafrole;

Malonic acid;

Methylamine;

3,4-methylenedioxyphenyl-2-propanone;

Morpholine;

N-acetylanthranilic acid;

N-ethylephedrine;

N-ethylpseudoephedrine;

N-methylephedrine;

(AA)

N-methylpseudoephedrine;

(BB)

Norpseudoephedrine;

(CC)

Nitroethane;

(DD)

Phenyl-2-propanone;

(EE)

Phenylacetic acid;

(FF)

Phenylpropanolamine;

(GG)

Piperidine;

(HH)

Piperonal;

(JJ)

Propionic anhydride;

(KK)

Pseudoephedrine;

(MM)

Pyrrolidine;

(NN)

Safrole.

“List II controlled substance precursor” means, including a chemical reagent, any salt, isomer or salt of an isomer of:

Acetic anhydride;

Acetone;

2-butanone;

Ethyl ether;

Hydrochloric acid;

Iodine;

Potassium permanganate;

Toluene.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 104, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 186 § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “section and W.S.

35-7-1059

” for “article,” and in (a)(iv), substituted “section or W.S.

35-7-1059

” for “article.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 186 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(viii), which read: “ ‘This article’ means W.S.

35-7-1058

and

35-7-1059

.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) or subparagraph (a)(vi)(I), (a)(vi)(L), (a)(vi)(V), or (a)(vi)(X), (a)(vi)(II) or (a)(vi)(LL) in this section as it appears on the printed acts.

Constitutionality. —

Sections

35-7-1058

and

35-7-1059

were not unconstitutionally vague as applied to the defendant where the defendant possessed methamphetamine precursors, his co-tenant testified that the defendant was prepared to cook up a batch of “crank,” ephedrine was found in a piece of tubing seized from the defendant's apartment, and the defendant possessed methamphetamine at the time of his arrest. Statezny v. State, 2001 WY 22, 18 P.3d 641,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2001).

Controlled substance precursors. —

Depending on specific information, acid, iodine, phosphorous, and alcohol-based solvent might be considered precursors under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1058(a)(vi) and (vii). Browning v. State, 2001 WY 93, 32 P.3d 1061,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2001).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction of possessing a controlled substance precursor with intent to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation where the jury was instructed that ephedrine, hydriotic acid, pseudoephedrine, acetone, hydrochloric acid, and iodine, which were List I and II controlled substance precursors, were found in a box in the apartment, and both defendant and his roommate had access to that box.
Holzheuser v. State, 2007 WY 160, 169 P.3d 68,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2007).

Cited

in

Pine v. State, 2001 WY 133, 37 P.3d 368,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2001).

Quoted

in

Innis v. State, 2003 WY 66, 69 P.3d 413,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 35-7-1059.
Unlawful clandestine laboratory operations; methamphetamine precursors; presumptively illegal amount; methamphetamine precursor sales limitations; registration requirements; reports; penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly or intentionally:

Possess a List I or II controlled substance precursor with the intent to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation;

Possess laboratory equipment or supplies with the intent to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation;

Sell, distribute or otherwise supply a List I or II controlled substance precursor, laboratory equipment or laboratory supplies knowing it will be used for a clandestine laboratory operation;

Conspire with or aid another to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years, a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), or both.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than twenty-five (25) years, a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), or both if the judge or jury also finds any one (1) of the following conditions occurred in conjunction with that violation:

Illegal possession, transportation or disposal of hazardous or dangerous material or while transporting or causing to be transported materials in furtherance of a clandestine laboratory operation, there was created a substantial risk to human health or safety or a danger to the environment;

The intended laboratory operation was to take place or did take place within five hundred (500) feet of a residence, business, church or school; or

Any phase of the clandestine laboratory operation was conducted in the presence of a person less than eighteen (18) years of age.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than forty (40) years, a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), or both if the judge or jury also finds any one (1) of the following conditions occurred in conjunction with that violation:

Use of a firearm;

Use of a booby trap.

Except as provided in this subsection, no person shall possess a drug product containing more than fifteen (15) grams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers or salts of isomers. This subsection shall not apply to the following persons who are lawfully possessing drug products in the course of legitimate business:

A retail distributor or wholesaler of drug products registered with the board;

A wholesale drug distributor licensed by the board;

A drug manufacturer licensed by the board;

A pharmacist licensed by the board;

A licensed health care professional possessing the drug products in the course of practicing his profession;

A person in possession of more than fifteen (15) grams of methamphetamine precursor drugs in the person’s home or residence under circumstances consistent with typical medicinal or household use as indicated by, but not limited to, storage location and possession of products in a variety of strengths, brands, types, purposes and expiration dates.

A person who knowingly or intentionally violates subsection (e) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years, a fine of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), or both.

The retail sale of methamphetamine precursor drugs shall be limited as follows:

No person shall obtain more than a total of three and six-tenths (3.6) grams per calendar day, regardless of the number of transactions, of one (1) or more methamphetamine precursor drugs, calculated in terms of the active equivalent of ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base or phenylpropanolamine base;

Sales in blister packs, each blister containing not more than two (2) dosage units or, when the use of blister packs is not technically feasible, sales in unit dose packets or pouches;

No person shall obtain more than nine (9) grams of ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base or phenylpropanolamine base, of which no more than seven and one-half (7.5) grams can be imported by private or commercial carrier or the United States postal service, during any thirty (30) day period.

No person shall sell in a single retail transaction more than two (2) packages of a product containing methamphetamine precursor drugs. The seller shall maintain a written or electronic list of such sales in a logbook that identifies the products by name, the quantity sold, the names and addresses of purchasers, and the date and time of the sales except that such requirement does not apply to any purchase by an individual of a single sales package if that package contains not more than sixty (60) milligrams of pseudoephedrine. The seller shall maintain each entry in the logbook for not fewer than two (2) years after the date on which the entry is made. The regulated seller who in good faith releases logbook information to federal, state or local law enforcement authorities is immune from civil liability for such release unless the release constitutes gross negligence or intentional, wanton or willful misconduct.

A retail distributor of products containing methamphetamine precursors shall sell them in one (1) of the following ways:

Product packages are displayed behind a store counter, in an area not accessible to customers;

Product packages are displayed in a locked case so that a customer must ask a store employee for assistance in purchasing the product;

Product packages are displayed within thirty (30) feet of and in the direct line of sight of a cash register or store counter staffed by a store employee and the store employs a reliable alarm system to prevent the theft of multiple product packages;

Product packages are displayed in a location that is under constant video surveillance and:

Persons examining or removing packages are within the camera’s view;

The video camera records recognizable images at least once every ten (10) seconds;

Surveillance images are preserved for at least one hundred sixty-eight (168) hours and are available to law enforcement authorities immediately upon request;

The retail distributor posts a sign in a prominent manner stating that the area is under constant video surveillance;

The retail distributor reports to local law enforcement any theft or suspected thefts.

A person who intentionally or knowingly violates subsection (g), (h) or (j) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for a first offense, five hundred dollars ($500.00) for a second offense within two (2) years and one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and up to six (6) months imprisonment, or both, for a third offense within three (3) years.

A resident or nonresident retailer, manufacturer or wholesaler who distributes ephedrine, pseudoephedrine or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers or salts of isomers in Wyoming shall:

Register with the board by submitting an application on a form prescribed by the board and pay a registration fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Where the retailer, manufacturer or wholesaler distributions are conducted at more than one (1) location, each location shall be separately registered. Except as provided in subsection (n) of this section, those facilities registered with the board under W.S.

35-7-1024

on July 1, 2005, shall not be required to register under this section;

Notify the board of the occurrence of any of the following:

The permanent closing of the retailer, manufacturer or wholesaler outlet;

A change in ownership, name, management or location.

Be subject to inspection by the board. Inspections shall be conducted during normal business hours and shall be limited to the following:

For retail distribution, inspection of the method of display and sale of any drug products covered by this section;

For manufacturer or wholesaler distribution, inspection of the purchase and sale records of any drug products covered by this section.

Display the registration issued by the board in a conspicuous location in the place of business;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 45, § 2.

A registration issued under this section shall be renewed annually, on or before September 30, by submitting a renewal application supplied by the board and paying the renewal fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Renewal applications postmarked after September 30 shall be subject to a late fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) which shall be in addition to the renewal fee.

The board may revoke, suspend or assess an administrative penalty for violations of subsection (m) of this section not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for a first offense, five hundred dollars ($500.00) for a second offense within two (2) years and one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for a third offense within three (3) years. Any administrative penalty assessed shall be paid to the board who shall remit the monies to the county treasurer to the credit of the public school fund of the county in which the violation occurred.

For purposes of this section, “methamphetamine precursor drug” means any product that contains ephedrine, pseudoephedrine or phenylpropanolamine or liquid products with ephedrine or pseudoephedrine as the sole active ingredient and may be marketed or distributed lawfully in the United States under the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act as a nonprescription drug.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 104, § 1; 2005, ch. 230, §§ 9, 12; ch. 246, § 1; 2011, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 246, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (e) through (p).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 230, §§ 9 and 12, deleted the last sentence of (k), which read: “It shall be a defense to violation under paragraph (g)(ii) of this section that the person making the sale required and obtained proof of age from a purchaser who produced a false, forged or altered document that an ordinarily prudent person would believe to be legitimate”; and updated internal references.

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating all of the 2005 amendments.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (g), deleted “nonliquid” preceding “methamphetamine” and “or liquid products with ephedrine or pseudoephedrine as the sole active ingredient” following “drugs,” and substituted “as follows” for “to”; in (g)(i), substituted “No person shall obtain more than a total of three and six-tenths (3.6) grams per calendar day, regardless of the number of transactions” for “Sales in packages containing not more than three (3) grams,” and “base” for “hydrochloride and,” and inserted “or phenylpropanolamine base”; added (g)(iii); in (h), substituted “of a product containing methamphetamine precursor drugs” for “as described in subsection (g) of this section,” and added the second through fourth sentences; repealed former (m)(v), pertaining to providing reports to the board; and in (p), substituted “any product that contains” for “nonliquid,” and inserted “and may be marketed or distributed lawfully in the United States under the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act as a nonprescription drug.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. —

See 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

Application. —

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 245, § 1, appropriates $2,000,000 from the general fund to the department of health for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, to increase access to treatment for persons addicted to methamphetamine and other controlled substances. Section 2 appropriates $5,000,000 from the general fund to the office of the attorney general for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, to provide funding for the purpose of employing law enforcement officers, public defenders and prosecuting attorneys, or providing overtime pay to current law enforcement officers to investigate and assist in the prosecution of offenses related to the use, sale or manufacture of methamphetamine or other controlled substances, which funds may also be used to pay for tests for the use of illegal drugs and controlled substances for persons who have been convicted of a crime or adjudicated delinquents. Section 2 further appropriates $500,000 from the general fund for competitive grants to cities and counties for probation services for juveniles sentenced to probation by circuit or municipal courts. Section 3 appropriates $1,000,000 from the general fund to the department of health beginning July 1, 2005, to provide funding for the implementation of best practices prevention and intervention services including parenting skills, life skills and indicated therapeutic interventions for the children and families of those individuals receiving treatment or addiction to methamphetamine and other controlled substances. Section 4 directs the department of health to prepare a request for proposal and solicit proposals from interested public and private entities to increase access to residential treatment for those who are addicted to methamphetamine and other controlled substances. Not later than October 30, 2005, the department of health, in consultation with the governor's advisory board on substance abuse and violent crime, shall review all proposals submitted and submit recommendations to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and joint appropriations interim committee.

Laws 2005, ch. 245, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2005.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.” The introductory language to ch. 230, §§ 9 and 12, directs that the amendments by those section are effective notwithstanding the conflicting legislation provision.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 135, § 1, appropriates $50,000 from the general fund to the department of health to conduct a methamphetamine initiative planning study. The department is to (1) review the scope of the methamphetamine problem as it exists in the state; (2) examine efforts currently being used in the state and elsewhere to address the problems associated with methamphetamine use, its prevention, correction and treatment including efforts by the department of health, the state's education system, law enforcement, the courts, social service agencies, local governments and the department of corrections and probation and parole; (3) determine the number of persons being treated for methamphetamine use, or needing treatment for methamphetamine use and the number of existing treatment beds available and potential treatment beds in health care and detention facilities in the state to provide the treatment for those persons in need of residential care; (4) determine the current capacity and potential needs for intensive and other types of out-patient treatment throughout the state by geographic regions; (5) examine the existing capacity and procedures for conducting and completing substance abuse evaluations ordered for methamphetamine use, abuse or distribution under
§ 7-13-1032 [
§

7-13-1302

], including the number of qualified evaluators available and conducting evaluations in the state, the costs associated with the evaluations and any recommendations to improve the capacity, quality, efficiency and effectiveness of the evaluation process, as necessary. The department of health may contract with an independent entity to perform the study and report back to the department with the results of the study. After review of the contractor's report to the department, the department is to submit its findings and recommendations to the governor's substance abuse and violent crime advisory board, the joint appropriations interim committee, the joint labor, health and social services interim committee, the joint judiciary interim committee and any select committee studying mental health and substance abuse services no later than October 15, 2005. The chairmen of these legislative committees are to coordinate efforts to review the problems and solutions identified by the department of health prior to the 2006 budget session of the legislature.

Laws 2005, ch. 135, § 2, makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Constitutionality. —

Sections

35-7-1058

and

35-7-1059

were not unconstitutionally vague as applied to the defendant where the defendant possessed methamphetamine precursors, his co-tenant testified that the defendant was prepared to cook up a batch of “crank,” ephedrine was found in a piece of tubing seized from the defendant's apartment, and the defendant possessed methamphetamine at the time of his arrest. Statezny v. State, 2001 WY 22, 18 P.3d 641,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2001).

This section is not rendered unconstitutionally vague on its face merely because the requisite intent might in some instances be inferred from circumstantial evidence, possibly including the nature and character of the items possessed. Browning v. State, 2001 WY 93, 32 P.3d 1061,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2001).

This section is not unconstitutionally vague in that a person of ordinary intelligence could read Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-7-1059

and comprehend that it would be unlawful to possess and transport a pipe with methamphetamine residue, a separate quantity of methamphetamine, a triple beam scale, tubing, acid, iodine, phosphorous, alcohol-based solvent, and written notations indicating what it would cost to purchase a pound of sudanephrine or epinephrine. Browning v. State, 2001 WY 93, 32 P.3d 1061,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2001).

Paragraph (a)(ii) is not so deficient on its face that a person of ordinary intelligence could read the statute and comprehend what conduct is prohibited, notwithstanding that the terms “supplies” and “separate funnel” are not defined in the statute. Pine v. State, 2001 WY 133, 37 P.3d 368,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2001).

Evidence sufficient. —

Defendant's conviction for engaging in an unlawful clandestine laboratory operation was affirmed, where the totality of the circumstances and accompanying inferences, including the nature of defendant's association with a driver and a vehicle, defendant's fingerprints, the stains observed on scales found in the vehicle, defendant's hands, and a towel retrieved from defendant's belongings, in addition to defendant's own statements and the evidence contained in her possessions, established a direct nexus between defendant, a water cooler and its contents, and the other items that comprised the clandestine laboratory operation. Pine v. State, 2001 WY 133, 37 P.3d 368,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2001).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction of possessing a controlled substance precursor with intent to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation because the jury was instructed that ephedrine, hydriotic acid, pseudoephedrine, acetone, hydrochloric acid, and iodine, which were List I and II controlled substance precursors, were found in a box in the apartment, and both defendant and his roommate had access to that box.
Holzheuser v. State, 2007 WY 160, 169 P.3d 68,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2007).

Intent requirement. —

It is not the mere possession of laboratory equipment or supplies that is unlawful; rather, it is unlawful to possess these items with the intent to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation. Browning v. State, 2001 WY 93, 32 P.3d 1061,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2001).

Where defendant was convicted of conspiracy in Wyoming in connection with methamphetamine manufacturing in Colorado and asserted that the only thing that occurred in Wyoming was the purchase of cold tablets, which was not a crime, and all other actions transpired in Colorado, the Wyoming courts still had jurisdiction because the conspiracy continued and was reaffirmed in Wyoming, and the overt act, which was central to the purpose of the conspiracy, occurred in Wyoming. Innis v. State, 2003 WY 66, 69 P.3d 413,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2003).

Conspiracy. —

Where the State presented no evidence of an agreement between one or more persons to commit a crime, conviction for conspiracy to engage in a clandestine laboratory was reversed.
Holzheuser v. State, 2007 WY 160, 169 P.3d 68,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2007).

Cited

in

Meadows v. State, 2003 WY 37, 65 P.3d 33,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2003); Hall v. State, 2005 WY 35, 109 P.3d 499,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(2005).

Article X

§ 35-7-1060.
Controlled substance prescription tracking program.

In addition to other duties and responsibilities as provided by this act, the board shall maintain a computerized program to track prescriptions for controlled substances for the purposes of assisting patients, practitioners and pharmacists to avoid inappropriate use of controlled substances and of assisting with the identification of illegal activity related to the dispensing of controlled substances. The tracking program and any data created thereby shall be administered by the board, and the board may charge reasonable fees to help defray the costs of operating the program. Any fee shall be included with and in addition to other registration fees established by the board as authorized in W.S.

35-7-1023

. The board shall promulgate rules to administer the tracking program under this section. Rules adopted under this subsection may specify requirements and procedures for practitioners, pharmacists and any other person authorized or required to use the tracking program.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, when a practitioner, other than a veterinarian, prescribes a schedule II, III, IV or V controlled substance, the practitioner or his delegate shall search the prescription tracking program for prior prescriptions issued to the patient before first issuing the prescription and as needed thereafter based on current best practice guidelines for the practitioner’s licensed profession, except for prescribed opioids for which the practitioner or his delegate shall repeat the search every three (3) months thereafter for as long as the prescribed opioids remain a part of the patient’s treatment. A practitioner who prescribes a schedule V controlled substance shall only be required to search the program as otherwise provided in this subsection if the substance is an opioid. A dispenser, other than a veterinarian, shall electronically file with the board information regarding any prescription for a schedule II, III, IV or V controlled substance dispensed by the dispenser no later than the close of business on the business day immediately following the day the controlled substance was dispensed. The board may grant a reasonable time extension to a dispenser or practitioner who is unable to electronically file or search information as required under this subsection. The board may require the filing of other prescriptions and may specify the manner in which the prescriptions are filed. The board may, by rule and regulation, provide exemptions from the requirements of this subsection including but not limited to exemptions for prescriptions dispensed in certain inpatient health care settings, for settings where the risk for diversion or misuse of medication is found by the board to be minimal and exemptions for emergencies and other situations as determined by the board in consultation with other professional licensing boards that license practitioners who are affected by the requirements of this subsection.

The tracking program shall not be used to infringe on the legal use of a controlled substance. Information obtained through the controlled substance prescription tracking program is confidential and may not be released and is not admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding, except as follows:

The board may release information to practitioners and practitioner appointed delegates and to pharmacists and pharmacist appointed delegates when the release of the information may be of assistance in preventing or avoiding inappropriate use of controlled substances. The board shall release information to practitioners and practitioner appointed delegates and to pharmacists and pharmacist appointed delegates when the release of the information is necessary to comply with the requirements of subsection (b) of this section;

The board shall report any information that it reasonably suspects may relate to fraudulent or illegal activity to the appropriate law enforcement agency and the relevant occupational licensing board;

The board may release information to the patient to whom the information pertains or his agent or, if the patient is a minor, to his parents or guardian;

The board may release information to a third party if the patient has signed a consent specifically for the release of his controlled substance prescription information to the specific third party;

The board may release information that does not identify individual patients, practitioners, pharmacists or pharmacies, for educational, research or public information purposes;

Subject to the rules of evidence, information obtained from the program is admissible in a criminal proceeding or an administrative proceeding involving professional licensing;

The board may establish data sharing agreements for purposes of this section and may release information to participating states when the release of the information may be of assistance in preventing or avoiding inappropriate use of controlled substances.

Unless there is shown malice, gross negligence, recklessness or willful and wanton conduct in disclosing information collected under this act, the board, any other state agency and any other person or entity in proper possession of information as provided by this section shall not be subject to any civil or criminal liability or action for legal or equitable relief.

The board may apply for and accept any gifts, grants or donations to assist in developing and maintaining the program required by this section.

The board may conduct a survey or audit of a practitioner’s usage of the state computerized program to track prescriptions in relation to the practitioner’s prescribing patterns. If the board finds low or inappropriate usage of the program the board shall report its findings to the practitioner’s professional licensing board.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 176, § 1; 2009, ch. 167, § 2; 2011, ch. 45, § 1; 2015 ch. 135, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 96, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 39, § 1, effective March 10, 2020; 2020 ch. 68, § 1, effective March 12, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “no more than seven (7) days after dispensed” at the end of the first sentence in (b).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted present (c)(iv), and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in the first sentence in (b), substituted “later than the close of business on the business day immediately following the day the controlled substance was dispensed” for “more than seven (7) days after dispensed”; and in (c)(i), substituted “practitioners and practitioner appointed delegates and to pharmacists and pharmacist appointed delegates” for “practitioners
and pharmacists.”

The 2018 amendment,

in the first sentence of (b), substituted “A dispenser shall electronically file with the board information regarding any prescription for a schedule II, III, IV or V controlled substance dispensed by the dispenser” for “All prescriptions for schedule II, III and IV controlled substances dispensed by any retail pharmacy licensed by the board shall be filed with the board electronically or by other means required by the board” preceding “no later than,” added the present second sentence, and added the fourth sentence.

Laws 2018, ch. 96, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), added the first and second sentences, substituted “dispenser, other than a veterinarian, shall” for “dispenser shall,” “dispenser or practitioner who” for dispenser who,” “file or search information as required” for “file information required,” “subsection including exemptions for prescriptions” for “subsection prescriptions,” added “and exemptions for emergencies and other situations” following “heath care settings,” made stylistic changes, and added “who are affected by the requirements of this subsection” at the end; in the introductory language in (c)(i), added the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 39, § 1, added (c)(viii) and made related changes.

Laws 2020, ch. 39, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 68, § 1, in (a) added the last two sentences; in (b) added “as needed thereafter based on current best practice guidelines for the practitioner's licensed profession, except for prescribed opioids for which the practitioner or his delegate” following “the prescription and,” substituted “prescribed opioids remain” for “controlled substance remains,” added “but not limited to” preceding “exemptions for prescriptions,” and “for settings where the risk for diversion or misuse of medication is found by the board to be minimal” preceding “and exemptions for emergencies”; and added (f)

Laws 2020, ch. 68, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2020.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Application. —

§ 35-7-1061.
Pilot program for real-time database data access. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 167, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 135, § 2, effective January 1, 2016.

§ 35-7-1062.
Pilot program implementation assistance. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 167, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 135, § 2, effective January 1, 2016.

§ 35-7-1063.
Exceptions to provisions.

The provisions and penalties of this chapter shall not apply to:

The possession or use of hemp or hemp products for any purpose or application;

Persons in possession of any controlled substances for purposes of disposal in accordance with 21 C.F.R. part 1317.30 and 21 C.F.R. part 1317.35;

Hemp production, processing or testing in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

11-51-101

through

11-51-107

.

As used in this section “hemp” or “hemp product” means all parts, seeds and varieties of the plant cannabis sativa l. or a product made from that plant with a trans-delta 9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis.

History.

2015 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 212, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 173, § 2, effective March 6, 2019.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a) and (a)(i); and added (ii).

The 2017 amendment

,
effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(iii).

The 2019 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted “possession or” for “medical” and “hemp or hemp products for any purpose or application” for “hemp extract when used in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

35-7-1901

through

35-7-1903

,” in (a)(iii), substituted “Hemp production, processing or testing” for “Industrial hemp farming,” and “W.S.

11-51-101

through

11-51-107

” for “W.S.

35-7-2101

through

35-7-2109

, or industrial hemp grown for research purposes by the university or the department of agriculture”; and added (b).

Laws 2019, ch. 173, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 102, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

Definition of hemp. —

Because the burden to establish an exception under the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act is on the person claiming the exception, defendant, who claimed to have possessed hemp, which is not a controlled substance, bore the burden of establishing that the substance was hemp, defined as cannabis with a tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration of not more than 0.3 percent. Thus, sufficient evidence supported defendant’s conviction for possession of marijuana without evidence of THC concentration. Roman v. State, 2022 WY 48, 507 P.3d 453,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2022).